Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-409
Public utility districts; extension or enlargement of service; optional procedures.

The city council, village board of trustees, or board of directors of a metropolitan utilities district in the city, village, or metropolitan utilities district in this state having general charge, supervision, and control of all matters pertaining to the water or gas supply or other utility service of such city, village, or metropolitan utilities district may by resolution elect and determine to proceed under sections 18-401 to 18-411 in the matter of ordering and making and causing to be made extensions or enlargements of water or gas mains or other utility service in such cities, villages, or metropolitan utilities districts but are not required to do so.

Laws 1921, c. 110, § 7, p. 389;

C.S.1922, § 4481;

C.S.1929, § 18-1007;

R.S.1943, § 18-409;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 69;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 20.

The district may extend water mains beyond city limits and enlarge district to include territory served by such extensions. Murphy v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 126 Neb. 663, 255 N.W. 20 (1934).